Montana, session 2025, SB506.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Legislative e-mail accounts -- electronic communications. (1) A
legislator may choose a preferred e-mail address to select as the legislator's primary e-mail address for
electronic communications from the legislative branch or to be listed with the legislator's public profile as a point
of contact for members of the public.
(2) A legislator who designates a primary e-mail address that is different from the e-mail address
provided and managed by the office of legislative information services is responsible for managing the
electronic communications related to legislative business in accordance with the requirements of Title 2,
chapter 6, part 10, and the requirements of the legislative branch's records management plan required under 2-
6-1012(1)(d).

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 5, chapter 11, part 4, and the provisions of Title 5, chapter 11, part 4, apply to [section 1].

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 506